Utah statutes.
63A-5-215.   Disposition of proceeds received by division from sale of property.

(1)  The money received by the division from the sale or other disposition of property shall be paid into the state treasury and becomes a part of the funds provided by law for carrying out the building program of the state, and are appropriated for that purpose.

(2)  The proceeds from sales of property belonging to or used by a particular state institution or agency shall, to the extent practicable, be expended for the construction of buildings or in the performance of other work for the benefit of that institution or agency.

